apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="li__prn" c="p.18 / 105">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la__prn" c="p.18 / 105">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/lu__prn" c="p.18 / 105">
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ddu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ddui</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>los</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ddos</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="si__prn" c="p.20 / 105">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nde__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cant/u__prn" c="p.30">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cale__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chie__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ite__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="àter/u__prn" c="p.27 /105">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="un/u_àteru__prn" c="">
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>ateru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u<b/>ateru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a<b/>atera</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>os<b/>ateros</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>as<b/>ateras</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>àteru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>'àteru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>u<b/>àteru</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a<b/>àtera</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os<b/>àteros</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as<b/>àteras</l><r>u<b/>àteru<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perun/u__prn" c="">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>nu</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amb/os__prn" c="p.27 /105">
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aduas</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nemos__prn" c="p.27 /105">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/su_cale__rel">
      <e>       <p><l>su<b/>cale</l><r>su<b/>cale<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sa<b/>cale</l><r>su<b/>cale<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sos<b/>cales</l><r>su<b/>cale<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sas<b/>cales</l><r>su<b/>cale<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>is<b/>cales</l><r>su<b/>cale<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="/su__det" c="p.25">
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>su</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>sa</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>su</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sa</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sos</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sas</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l><r>su<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tot/u__predet" c="">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/unu__det" c="p.25">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>unu</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>una</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d-una</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>unu</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>una</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>unus</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>unos</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unas</l><r>unu<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ogni__det" c="">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="carchi__det" c="">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="si__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="li"><i>li</i><par n="li__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="li" r="LR"><p><l>ddi</l><r>li</r></p><par n="li__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="la"><i>la</i><par n="la__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="la" r="LR"><p><l>dda</l><r>la</r></p><par n="la__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lu"><i></i><par n="/lu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cantu"><i>cant</i><par n="cant/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cale"><i>cale</i><par n="cale__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="chie"><i>chie</i><par n="chie__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ite"><i>ite</i><par n="ite__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="unu àteru"><i>un</i><par n="un/u_àteru__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cadaunu"><i>cadaun</i><par n="àter/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ambos"><i>amb</i><par n="amb/os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="perunu"><i>perun</i><par n="perun/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="calicunu"><i>calicun</i><par n="perun/u__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nemos"><i>nemos</i><par n="nemos__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nde"><i>nde</i><par n="nde__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nde" r="LR"><p><l>ndi</l><r>nde</r></p><par n="nde__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nche"><i>nche</i><par n="nde__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="su cale"><i></i><par n="/su_cale__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="su"><i></i><par n="/su__det"/></e>
    <e lm="unu"><i></i><par n="/unu__det"/></e>
    <e lm="totu"><i>tot</i><par n="tot/u__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="totu" r="LR"><p><l>tott</l><r>tot</r></p><par n="tot/u__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni"><i>ogni</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>onnia</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>onnya</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>dd-onnya</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>ònni</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>onzi</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>onni</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ogni" r="LR"><p><l>ongi</l><r>ogni</r></p><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="cada"><i>cada</i><par n="ogni__det"/></e>
    <e lm="carchi"><i>carchi</i><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="carchi" r="LR"><p><l>calchi</l><r>carchi</r></p><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="carchi" r="LR"><p><l>charchi</l><r>carchi</r></p><par n="carchi__det"/></e>
